California, session 20252026, AB1835.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8627 of the Government Code is amended to read:8627. During a state of emergency the Governor shall, to the extent he the Governor deems necessary, have complete authority over all agencies of the state government and the right to exercise within the area designated all police executive power vested in the state by the Constitution and laws of the State of California in order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. In exercise thereof, he the Governor shall promulgate, issue, and enforce such all orders and regulations as he the Governor deems necessary, in accordance with the provisions of Section 8567.SEC. 2. Section 8629 of the Government Code is amended to read:8629. (a) The Governor shall proclaim the termination of a state of emergency at the earliest possible date that conditions warrant. All(b) (1) A state of emergency that has not been terminated by the Governor shall automatically terminate 90 days after the Governor’s proclamation pursuant to Section 8625 unless the Legislature extends it by a concurrent resolution.(2) The Legislature may, by a concurrent resolution, extend a state of emergency before its termination pursuant to paragraph (1) or pursuant to a previous concurrent resolution.(c) All of the powers granted the Governor by this chapter with respect to a state of emergency shall terminate when the either of the following occur:(1) The state of emergency has been terminated terminates by proclamation of the Governor or by concurrent resolution of the Legislature declaring it at an end.(2) The state of emergency terminates pursuant to subdivision (b).